Alabama, session 2026rs, HB621.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 41-9-623.2 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§41-9-623.2
(a) This section shall be known as the Sergeant WyTasha
Carter Truth and Transparency Act.
(b) Not later than July 1, 2026, and February 1,
annually thereafter, each criminal justice agency shall report
all of the following on a form prescribed by the Alabama State
Law Enforcement Agency:
(1) The number of sworn law enforcement officers
employed by the criminal justice agency.
(2) Whether the employed law enforcement officers are
certified by the Alabama Peace Officers' Standards and
Training Commission, or otherwise recognized in state law as a
law enforcement officer with the authority to arrest an
individual for the commission of a criminal offense.
(c) Each criminal justice agency shall submit the
report to the Alabama Criminal Justice Information Commission
who shall share that information with the Alabama State Law
Enforcement Agency and the Attorney General.
(d) The Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency shall
compile the reports and annually publish the reports or the
results of the reports on the agency's official website.
Page 2

results of the reports on the agency's official website.
HB621 INTRODUCED
(e) The Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency shall
adopt rules to implement this section.
Section 2. Section 41-9-600, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§41-9-600
(a) Any officer or official mentioned in this article
who neglects or refuses to make any report or to do any act
required in this article shall be subject to prosecution for a
Class C misdemeanor, and, if found guilty, may be fined not
less than one hundred dollars ($100)$100.00 nor more than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000), $10,000.00 and may be confined in
a county jail for not more than one year.
(b) He In addition to subsection (a), the officer or
official shall also be subject to prosecution for nonfeasance
and, if found guilty, shall be subject to removal from office
therefor.
(c) Any criminal justice agency that fails to timely
submit any report required under this article shall lose the
ability to participate in any grant program administered by
the Alabama Department of Economic and Community Affairs."
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3